Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-1907
Sections, how construed.

Nothing in sections 48-1901 to 48-1906 shall be construed to establish any rule, right, or duty not expressly provided for in such sections.

Laws 1988, LB 582, § 7.